Maine, session 132, LD33.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 8 MRSA §1101, sub-§4, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 303, §2, is amended
to read:
A. One Two or more fantasy contestants per game or contest, none of which may be
the fantasy contest operator, pay an entry fee to participate;
Sec. 2. 8 MRSA §1105, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 303, §2, is amended to
read:
2. Allocation of funds. The director shall collect for deposit to the General Fund 10%
of gross fantasy contest revenues, including any revenues earned while operating pending
approval of an application submitted to the director as described in section 1103, subsection
9, from a fantasy contest operator licensed under this chapter that has gross fantasy contest
revenues of $100,000 or greater.
Page 1 - 132LR0297(03)